Massachusetts, session 194th, S265.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 1 of Chapter 93H, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended 
by adding to the definition of “personal information” the following subsection:- "(d) date of 
birth".